Wisconsin, session 2025, AB303.
do enact as follows:AB303,13Section 1. 46.533 of the statutes is created to read:AB303,2,2446.533 Suicide and crisis lifeline; grants. (1) In this section, “national 5crisis hotline” means the telephone or text access number “988,” or its successor, 1that is maintained under the federally administered program under 42 USC 290bb-236c.AB303,2,53(2) The department shall award grants to organizations that provide crisis 4intervention services and crisis care coordination to individuals who contact the 5national crisis hotline from anywhere within this state.AB303,2,66